Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-147
Lien recording; contents.

(1) A claimant may record a lien which shall be signed by the claimant and state:

(a) The real estate subject to the lien, with a description thereof sufficient for identification;

(b) The name of the person against whose interest in the real estate a lien is claimed;

(c) The name and address of the claimant;

(d) The name and address of the person with whom the claimant contracted;

(e) A general description of the services performed or to be performed or materials furnished or to be furnished for the improvement and the contract price thereof;

(f) The amount unpaid, whether or not due, to the claimant for the services or materials or if no amount is fixed by the contract a good faith estimate of the amount designated as an estimate; and

(g) The time the last services or materials were furnished or if that time has not yet occurred, an estimate of the time.

(2) The name given in the lien in accordance with the requirement of subdivision (1)(b) of this section may be the name of the contracting owner or the name of the record holder of the contracting owner's interest at the time of recording the lien.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 23.